 We now have 4-month-old mice that are not diabetic whereas they were before.
 Dr Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the Canadian diabetes Association's clinical and scientific division, warned that research is still in its early days.
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, noting that these results are not applicable to people who are already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, during a radio broadcast on Sveriges Radio in Sweden, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Prize in literature, publicly announced that the Academy, unable to reach Bob Dylan directly about the 2016 Nobel Prize in literature, had given up trying to contact him.
 Danius said, I have called and sent Emails to his closest collaborator and I have received very friendly responses.
 Before, Ring's Ceo, Jamie Siminoff, had remarked that he launched the company when the Bell of his front door was not audible from his shop in his garage.
 He says he invented a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Mr . Siminoff has said that sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in 2013, where the show's panel of investors refused to finance the start-up.
 By the end of 2017, Siminoff had appeared on the home shopping channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with a competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 Even though an experimental vaccine seems so far to be able to reduce the rate of Ebola deaths, no cure has yet been found to treat the existing infection.
 Even though the administration of a cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, had initially shown promising signs on the ground, formal studies have now shown that its ability to limit deaths did not live up to expectations.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, which means the scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The American gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts the absolute necessity of the Olympic family to promote a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of our athletes and clubs, as well as their sport, could be better served by going forward and making meaningful changes within our organization, rather than by revoking accreditation.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how the abuse of the proportion so courageously described by the survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone unnoticed for so long and adopts any necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal: to make gymnastics, as well as other sports, as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as a counselor, then for the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 selections, he advised Carter on foreign policy, then became a national security advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 He helped Carter to diplomatically resolve international issues such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian revolution and its aftermath, such as the Iranian hostage crisis, in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Among the other nominations are best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best sound editing, best sound mixing, best original screenplay, and best adapted screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for Best Original Song.
 Late Sunday, U S . President Donald Trump, in a statement made through the Secretary of state, announced that U S . troops would be withdrawing from Syria.
 The announcement came after Mr . Trump had a phone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also take in the custody of captured ISIS fighters that, according to the statement, European nations have refused to repatriate.
 This confirms not only that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already widely accepted, but it provides details that fossils generally can't, like color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say that the animal's plumage was Brownish-Gray on the top and pale or Carotenoid on the underside.
 This discovery also helps us to better understand the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Given that dinosaur feathers did not have an entirely developed rachis, but showed other characteristics of feathers, such as barbs and barbules,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used in flight but rather for regulation or the display of temperature, and the researchers have suggested that even though it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the specimen shows an adult plumage and not the down of a chick.
 The scientists point out that it is the tail of a juvenile dinosaur, but the sample reveals a plumage belonging to an adult, not a young one.
 A car bomb exploded at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, this morning, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty others.
 The governor's office said that nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police have now identified a suspected Daesh militant as the person who carried out the attack.
 They have found that the sun operates according to the same basic principles as all the other stars.
 The luminosity and rotation are used together to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma flow.
 As for magnetic inversions, the smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star.
 Iwasaki had problems during his voyage, and he had to make several stops.
 It has been stolen by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal and been arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 This will allow backwards compatibility with 802.11a, b and g, provided the station has two radios.
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are significantly faster than those of its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, did not make a good impression on Miller, to whom the story was related.
 When asked to comment, Miller stated, quote, I was preparing, so I didn't really hear what he was saying.
 We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin by 2020 compared with the 2005 level,
 He did not quantify these reductions, saying they will be based on Chinese economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to avoid the old method of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added, however, that we should not ask them to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, their responsibility, and their capacities.
 The Iraq study group presented its report today at 12 GMT.
 He warned that no one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this stage will end sectarian war, the growing violence or the slide towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for an open debate and a consensus in the United States on the policy towards the Middle East.
 The report is very critical of almost every aspect of the government's current policy towards Iraq and strongly argues for a change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of the year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile interventions and to re-establish diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 The current Argentine Senator and First Lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Ms Kirchner announced her intention to run for the Presidency at the Teatro Argentino, the same place where she began her 2005 campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate was triggered by the controversy over the spending and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some budget conservatives have humorously called the Bush New Orleans spending agreement.
 The critics of the reconstruction effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to people perceived as Washington insiders.
 More than 4,000,000 people attended the funeral.
 Due to the large number of people present, it was not possible for everyone to attend the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 Several large television screens were set up at different locations in Rome to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland, similar installations have been realized and have been seen by a great number of people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policies for concentrating resources on easy-to-solve cases, in particular car thefts, with the intention of increasing the agency's success rate.
 The Congress launched funding for the anti-pornography initiative during the fiscal year 2005, while noting that the FBI was preparing to assign ten agents to the fight against adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest individual score of the innings, 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 four and 2 six.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, got good results and scored a century together.
 But after losing the captain's guichet, India has only completed 36 races and lost seven guichets until the end of the round.
 The American President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Wong Kan Seng, the Deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and discussed trade and terrorism with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore.
 After seven days of mid-term election defeats, Bush announced his plan to expand trade in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a multi-party committee for review before its second reading, after a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 Layton had asked for changes to the Conservatives' environmental bill during the meeting with the Prime Minister, asking for a full and thorough rewriting of the Conservatives' environmental bill.
 And since then, the Federal Government has taken the lead in funding the Mersey Hospital at Devonport, in Tasmania, and the state Government and some state parliamentarians have called it a farce in the lead up to the November state election.
 But Prime Minister John Howard has said that this law is only to prevent the hospital's facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government,
 According to the latest bulletin, tide gauges indicate that a tsunami has occurred, with a tsunami event recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No damage or injury was reported in Tonga, but electricity was temporarily cut off, which would have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools located on or near the coasts were closed all day Wednesday despite the lifting of the alerts.
 The American President, George W . Bush, welcomed the news.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean promise a major step towards the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Subtropical storm Jerry, the tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, formed this day in the Atlantic ocean.
 At this stage, the National Hurricane Center says, Jerry poses no threat to land.
 According to the U S . Army Corps of Engineers, a 6-inch rainfall could open a breach in the previously damaged levees.
 The ninth ward, which experienced flooding of up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is currently underwater up to the size of the nearby levee.
 The water pours over the dike in a 100-foot section.
 In his talk at Wikinews last month, Commons director Adam Cuerden expressed his frustration at the deletions that had been made.
 Wales had lied from the beginning, first by using legal reasons, then by pretending to listen to us until he had deleted his work.
 The community's discontent led to the current efforts to design a policy regarding the sexually-oriented content of the site that hosts millions of freely accessible media.
 The work that was done was primarily theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the observations that were being made of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect that the team was looking for would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 Just as the moon exerts a pull on the earth, causing tides, the Milky way exerts a force on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have been able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that normal matter affects normal matter.
 According to this theory, the majority of the dark matter around a galaxy is in a sort of halo, and is made up of a large number of small particles.
 The television reports show white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities are warning residents to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning units and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been identified at the plant.
 The authorities assume that this means the uranium fuel tanks on the site have cracks and leaks.
 Dr Tony Moll discovered Multi-Drug-Resistant TB in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 In an interview, he stated that the new mutation was ""very troubling and alarming because of the high rate of mortality.
 Some patients had contracted the virus at the hospital, according to Dr . Moll, and at least two of them were part of the hospital staff.
 Over a one-year period, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the percentage of TB-UR in the total group of people with tuberculosis still seems low, with 6,000 out of a total of 330,000 being infected at some point in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed both more than 450 kg and were moving at about 28,000 km per hour, collided at an altitude of 790 km above the earth.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 We're still trying to determine the extent of the accident and how the earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the United States Department of defense follows the debris.
 The result of the trace analysis will be published on a public Website.
 A doctor working at the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, has been charged with murder after his mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, according to Ohio authorities.
 Dr Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground at Blue Ash, in Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, wearing just a T-shirt and underwear,
 She directed the officers to her Oldsmobile Intrigue black which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered in blood-soaked blankets.
 The police have stated that the body has been there for about a day.
 The first cases of this seasonal illness were reported in late July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans by mosquitoes.
 The epidemic has incited the Indian government to take measures such as the deployment of pig collectors in the severely affected areas, the distribution of thousands of mosquito nets and the spraying of pesticides.
 Several million vaccine doses against encephalitis have also been promised by the government, which will help to prepare health agencies for next year.
 The plans for vaccine delivery in historically the hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed because of a lack of funds and the low priority given to these diseases compared to others.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where three years later, he began working for the Swedish postal service as its chief engraver.
 He has produced over 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is of such quality and of such a high level of detail that he is one of the few well-known philatelists who is known to the general public.
 His one thousandth stamp was the magnificent Great Deeds by Swedish Kings by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl in 2000, which is featured in the Guinness Book of World Records.
 He has also engraved banknotes for many countries, including the portraits of the Prime Minister on the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 Following the accident, Gibson was rushed to the hospital, but succumbed immediately after.
 The driver of the truck, a 64-year-old man, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 1200 GMT the same day.
 An employee of a nearby garage said, quote, there were children who were trying to cross the road, and they were screaming and crying.
 They all returned in a hurry from the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali include safeguarding the world's last forests and sharing technologies to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN hopes to finalise a fund to help countries hit by climate change to deal with the impacts.
 The money could be used to build houses that are resistant to flooding, to better manage water and to diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some to keep women from talking about their health failed.
 She came to this conclusion thanks to the multiple positive comments and encouragement she received from both women and men on the importance of considering contraception as a necessity.
 Once the fight was stopped after the injured were taken to the infirmary, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed in the yard, refusing to return to their cells.
 The negotiators have tried to rectify the situation, but the prisoners' demands are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 MDT, the inmates set a fire in the courtyard.
 Soon, officers wearing riot gear entered the courtyard and coerced the detainees with tear gas.
 The team of firefighters finally put out the fire at 23:35.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that used to spread sediment into the river has been stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the creation of sand banks and beaches, which served as habitats for the fauna.
 Two species of fish have been lost, and two others are in danger of being lost, including the bullhead.
 Although the water level will only rise a few metres after the flood, authorities hope that this will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 No tsunami alert was issued, and according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no tsunami alert will be issued because the earthquake did not reach the required magnitude of 6.5.
 Despite the lack of a tsunami risk, residents panicked and fled their homes and businesses.
 Despite the tears shed during her farewell, Oprah Winfrey clearly told her fans that she would be back.
 And it's not a goodbye, it's a page that's turning, and another one that's opening.
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections indicate that the outgoing President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, has been re-elected by a large majority.
 The ruling party, the South West African People's Organisation, SWAPO, also managed to retain its majority in the National Assembly.
 The coalition and Afghan troops moved into the area to secure the site, and a coalition aircraft was sent to support.
 The accident took place in mountainous terrain, and it seems that it was caused by a malicious fire.
 The search for the wreckage is hampered by the weather and the rough terrain.
 According to the NGO, Médecins Sans Frontières, and the World Health Organisation, it is the worst outbreak the country has ever seen.
 The Angolan government has been criticised for its handling of the epidemic.
 The matches began at 10 a M with beautiful weather and, apart from the mid-morning shower which quickly dissipated, it was a perfect day for Rugby 7s.
 South Africa, at the head of the class, started out on a good note by beating Zambia, the fifth-ranked team, 26 to 0.
 South Africa, which had seemed decidedly rusty in its match against the Southern Hemisphere consortium,
 Their disciplined defense, their ball control and their formidable teamwork allowed them to stand out and it is obvious that they were the team to beat.
 The city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House claim that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a danger to public health, as they argue there is an immediate danger of it falling.
 He was due to be shot on Tuesday, but a last-minute court order saved him.
 All the entrances to the caves, which have been named the seven sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images reveal, based on the variations of temperature during the day and the night, that it is probably a cave.
 They are cooler than the surrounding surface during the day and warmer at night.
 Their thermal behavior is not as stable as that of the large caves on the planet that maintain a constant temperature, but they are similar in that they are deep holes in the earth, according to Glen Cushing, a member of the usgs team and the University of Arizona's northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters isolate themselves in a booth, put a piece of paper in an envelope, and mark the candidate of their choice.
 After the agents have verified the voter's identity, the voter throws the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter's card.
 The French electoral code regulates the operations quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the urns must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no envelope is present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelope is added, except those of the duly counted and authorised voters.
 Candidates may send representatives to attend each stage of the process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under high surveillance, according to specific procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously launched worldwide for reasons of economy and functionality, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month of 2007.
 But the market for notebooks will be profoundly disrupted and diversified after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 given by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station's Website describes the show as a, quote, old-school radio theater with a new and scandalous geeky twist.
 Initially, the show was only broadcast on the venerable Internet radio site TogiNet Radio, a site dedicated to spoken word radio.
 In 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 The widespread looting continued throughout the night, with no police presence in the streets of Bichkek.
 An observer described Bichkek as being in a state of anarchy, while the population was moving in bands through the streets and looting the shops of consumer goods.
 Several Bichkek residents have blamed the protesters from the south for the anarchy.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks of New Zealand in a Tri-Nations Rugby match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The match ended in a tie, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it was the end of a five-match losing streak.
 It was the last match of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the championship will take place at Johannesburg's Ellis Park Stadium next week when the Springboks will play Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana at 22:08 on Monday.
 The United States Geological Survey and its National earthquake information center have not received immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 kilometers (15 miles) north of Dillon, and about 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 The strain of the deadly avian flu, H5N1, has been confirmed as having infected a dead wild duck found Monday in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be hit by the virus, following Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 The suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for the mass murder, destruction, and terror inflicted on millions and millions of earth's inhabitants.
 Chambers, an Angel, affirms that his trial is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story presented in the French opera, by Camille Saint-Saens, is that of an artist whose life is dictated by his love for drugs and for Japan.
 As a result, artists smoke joints of cannabis on stage, and the theatre itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Newt Gingrich, the former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, the governor of Texas, and Senator Michele Bachmann,
 After the publication of the results, Newt Gingrich congratulated Rick Santorum, but had harsh words for Mitt Romney, on whose behalf negative publicity campaigns had been aired in Iowa against Newt Gingrich.
 Perry stated that he would return to Texas to evaluate the results of the caucus that evening, and determine if there was a path for him to continue in the race, but he later affirmed that he would remain in the race and participate in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachmann, who had won the straw poll of the Iowa straw poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he died from his injuries.
 According to some reports, he is in his early twenties, and in a statement, Bieber said, quote,
 The site of information TMZ affirms that the photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take pictures of the police stop before he crossed the road and continued, inciting the California highway patrol officer to order him to turn back, twice.
 According to police, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will face any criminal charges.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a number of countries failed to get on the podium.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen who finished ninth in the women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen who finished tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley finished 11th in the Super-G standing, while the Czech Oldrich Jelinek finished 16th in the Super-G sitting.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G, and the New Zealander Adam Hall finished in ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, are accused of spreading the disease that started near the troops' camp.
 According to the trial, the UN camp's waste was not properly disposed of, causing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti had not encountered any problems related to the disease since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for justice and democracy has referred to independent studies which suggest that the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion involuntarily brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University hospital had admitted the patient in a stable condition.
 The patient had traveled to Nigeria, where some Ebola virus cases have been reported.
 The hospital followed protocols for infection prevention, including isolating the patient to prevent any possible infection of other patients.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked on several other shows, occupying various positions.
 During the 1980s, he worked on such shows as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening and was responsible for the hiring of the first team of writers for the series.
 Despite his departure from the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 The Chinese state news agency Xinhua had previously announced the hijacking of the plane.
 Later reports then revealed that the aircraft had been the subject of a bomb threat and had been redirected to Kandahar in Afghanistan.
 The first reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after being refused an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air accidents are frequent in Iran, which has an ageing and poorly maintained fleet of both civilian and military aircraft.
 In addition, because of the international sanctions, it is not possible to purchase new planes.
 At the beginning of this week, an accident involving a police helicopter killed three people and injured three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst air disaster in years when a passenger plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 The same month, another airliner made a runway excursion at Mashhad and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The Aerosmith group has canceled the last concerts of its tour.
 The rock group was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They have canceled the tour after Steven Tyler injured himself by falling off stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie break after the two men had held serve throughout the set.
 Despite the net advantage of Del Potro during the second set, it took a tie-break once the score reached 6-6.
 Potro received treatment at this time for his shoulder, but managed to return to the match.
 The program started at 20:30 local time, which is 15:00 UTC.
 Famous singers from all over the country have sung bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma began the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan Bhog bhajan, accompanied by Raju Khandelwal.
 Lakkha Singh then took the initiative of singing the bhajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also presented the chhappan bhog bhajan, accompanied by Raju Khandelwal.
 On Thursday, during the main presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Nintendo's President, Satoru Iwata, revealed the design of the new Nintendo Revolution Console's Controller.
 Identical to a television remote control, the control uses two sensors placed near the user's television set to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and retired shortly after the start.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, dominated the race, but his stop at the pit lane ended this domination, probably because of a loose right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished his race shortly after Alonso, due to the damage suffered to the suspension of his car.
 She is very pretty, and she sings very well also,
 I was moved every time we did a rehearsal on this topic, from the depths of my heart.
 About three minutes after launch, an on-board camera showed numerous pieces of insulating foam detaching from the fuel tank.
 We're not sure, however, that they caused any damage to the shuttle.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had fallen off after the time that concerned us.
 Five minutes after the start of the exhibition, a wind began to blow, reaching, about a minute later, a speed of 70 km per hour.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way, there were two people in a wheelchair, people who were just jumping and pushing them.
 The NHK also said that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no effect from the earthquake, and that reactors number one and two at its Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 We're told that about 9,400 homes in the region are without water, and about 100 are without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, the rail service was suspended in the affected areas, and the Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture is still closed.
 A bomb went off in front of the governor-general's office.
 Three other bombs exploded near government buildings within two hours.
 Some reports say the number of dead is eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, but the final death toll is not yet known.
 Cyanuric acid and Melamine were found in the urine samples taken from the pets that had died after eating the contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the kidney function, researchers at the University have said.
 Investigators have discovered that crystals formed in the urine of cats as a result of these supplements.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to what is found in the urine of domesticated animals when we compare by infrared spectroscopy.
 I do not know if you realize it, but most of the goods coming from Central America are exempt from customs duty.
 Yet 80% of our goods were taxed by customs duties in the Central American countries.
 This did not seem logical to me, and it certainly was not fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, signed a law that prohibits the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The bill requires that violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a sticker bearing the words,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing the prosecution of Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne resigned and was replaced in the cabinet by the MP Ed Davey, who will take over as Minister of State for Energy and Climate Change.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before Westminster magistrates court on 16 February.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and the jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo reconstructive surgery for his face.
 Uka's weapon jammed as it was pointed at the head of a fifth man, Schneider, who suffers from a burning pain, can't see out of one eye, has lost part of his skull, and his face has been reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via Video-Link from an Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to Wednesday's event, Carpanedo has competed in two individual races during the championships.
 She first competed in the slalom, where she finished in 116th place out of 116 competitors.
 Her other run, the giant slalom, allowed her to finish in tenth place of the women's sitting with a combined time of 4:41.30, which is 2:11.60 minutes slower than the Austrian Claudia Loesch, who finished first, and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 In the women's sitting category, four skiers did not finish their run, and in the giant slalom, 45 skiers out of a total of 117 did not finish.
 The Madhya Pradesh police have recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The inspector general assistant D.K. Arya stated,
 The accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the police Commissioner, said the accused had their faces covered when they appeared in court.
 Although three people were in the house when the car hit it, no one was injured.
 However, the driver was seriously injured in the head.
 The road where the accident took place was temporarily closed to allow the emergency services to extract the driver of the red Audi TT.
 He was first admitted to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to the Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has since been charged with the murder of her son by the Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is currently in custody awaiting trial and her face has been widely circulated.
 This is a common practice elsewhere in the UK, but Scottish justice works differently, and the courts considered that publishing the photos would be potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson, of the University of Dundee, notes that, quote, journalists seem to be following a dangerous line if they publish photos, etc, of suspects.
 The office of the Attorney-General, which is in charge of all prosecutions, has told reporters that no further comment will be made until the indictment is filed.
 According to the leak, the document will focus on the Palestinian claim to the border based on the pre-1967 borders.
 Among the other topics discussed are the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel requires a permanent military presence in the valley for a period of ten years from the signing of an agreement, while the Palestinian authority only consents to a period of five years.
 The additional parasite control shooters were to be closely supervised by rangers, as the trial was controlled and its efficacy evaluated.
 In partnership with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting head of conservation at the NPWS, the four shooters designated for the first culling campaign had been duly trained and briefed on safety procedures.
 Martelly installed yesterday a new Provisional Electoral Council composed of nine members.
 This is the fifth PEC of Martelly in four years.
 Last month, a Presidential Commission recommended the dissolution of the previous CEP as part of a package of measures to engage the country on a path to new elections.
 This Commission was Martelly's response to the widespread protests against the regime that began in October.
 These protests, sometimes violent, have been triggered by the absence of elections, some of which were due to take place in 2011.
 About 60 defective iPods were reported, causing a total of six fires and leaving four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry has reported 27 incidents related to these devices.
 Last week, the METI announced that apple had informed them of 34 additional incidents, which the company described as non-serious.
 The Ministry has reacted by describing the report's delay as being, quote,
 The earthquake hit the Marianas at 7:19 a M local time Friday.
 The Guam Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Management reported no damage in Guam.
 In addition, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center said there was no sign of a tsunami.
 An ex-Philippine policeman took hostage a group of Hong Kong tourists by hijacking their bus in the Philippines' capital, Manila.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and the deaths of at least six of them have been confirmed so far.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released prematurely, as were the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then took the place of an elderly woman who needed to go to the toilet, and Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and became a medical doctor.
 He followed a training in obstetrics, and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When he was working at the hospital, Liggins began to investigate premature births in his spare time.
 His research has shown that if a hormone is administered, it will speed up the baby's lung maturation.
 The Xinhua news agency reported that government investigators recovered two flight recorders Wednesday.
 The other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer stated, quote, Unquote,
 Dustin Runnels commented that Luna was as bizarre as me,
 A poll of 1,400 people taken before the 2010 Federal election found that the number of people opposed to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 The acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard stated during the 2010 Federal election campaign that she thought Australia should become a Republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty-four percent of those surveyed share this view, and wish that Queen Elizabeth II were the last monarch to rule over Australia.
 At the extremes of the poll, 29% of people think that Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while 31% think that Australia should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but because of his complaints, his fitness was questioned.
 He was unable to take the medication he needed to overcome his pain, which was banned from the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered on January 25 the largest prime number known to date.
 Several people verified the discovery using different equipment and software at the beginning of February, and it was announced Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of water and organic matter for the earth, which can form proteins and support life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, and more specifically how the earth was formed, since comets have been in collision with it for a long time.
 Cuomo, 53, began his term as governor earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors, bullshit and political bullshit.
 He is expected to run for the Presidency in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that would allow planes to fly shorter distances and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, limiting carbon emissions.
 It relies on satellite technology, and not on the ground-based radar systems used previously, which allows air traffic controllers to locate planes with greater precision and to provide pilots with more detailed information.
 The additional transport is non-existent and surface trains will not stop at Wembley, and parking and park and ride facilities are not available on the ground.
 The fear of transportation has engendered the possibility that the match could be played behind closed doors, without the fans of the teams.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science has reported the genesis of a new bird species in the equatorial Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have indicated that the new species evolved in only two generations, although this process was estimated to be much longer, following reproduction between an endemic finch, Geospiza fortis, and the immigrant conirostris.
 One can shape gold in many ways. It can be rolled into tiny pieces,
 It can be drawn into a fine wire, which can be twisted and woven into cloth.
 It can be made very thin, and glued onto another metal, it can be so thin that it has sometimes been used to decorate the pictures painted by hand in the books called illuminated manuscripts.
 You can make an indicator by using beetroot juice.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color depending on the acidity or basicity of the chemical.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions, or H, present in the chemical being tested.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have been stripped of their electron (since hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dry powders together, then, with clean and moist hands, press them into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the outer layers, which will induce a strange sensation and produce a sort of a shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had toilets equipped with a flushing toilet in almost all the houses, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 In the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini in Greece, remains of sewage systems have been found.
 There were also toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia and China, and in the Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of the public baths where men and women would bathe together.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite receives the call in space and then beams it back to earth, almost instantaneously.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than 30 meters high to put a satellite or telescope into space.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, the greatest advantage it has brought us is that it has made transportation much easier and faster.
 This has brought us the train, the car, and many other means of transportation.
 Below them are smaller cats, eating prey of a similar size, from rabbits to antelopes and other small deer.
 In addition, there are numerous small cats, including pet cats, which eat the much more numerous small prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of a niche, a special task assigned to each cat, preventing it from entering into competition with the others.
 Lions are the most sociable cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The packs are made up of one to three adult males,
 Women are generally very close to each other, their family being composed of a large number of sisters and daughters.
 The lion troops act like wolf or dog packs, animals that are surprisingly similar to lions in their behavior, and also very deadly to their prey.
 The tiger is an evenly balanced athlete, capable of climbing, swimming, jumping great distances, and pulling with five times the strength of a powerful human.
 The tiger belongs to the same family as lions, leopards, and jaguars,
 The tiger's roar is not like the lion's roar, but rather like a sentence in which the words are cries and growls.
 Ocelots are also known to eat small animals, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 According to scientists, ocelots track and find their prey by smelling the scent of their prey's footprints on the ground.
 They see very well in the dark thanks to their nocturnal vision, and they move very stealthily,
 When a small group of living things (a small population) is separated from the main population from which it came,
 This new environment has different resources and competitors, so the new population will need different characteristics or adaptations in order to be a powerful competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all, they still need the same adaptations.
 Over time, as the new population adapts to its new environment, it begins to look less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they will no longer be considered to belong to the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which simply means the formation of new species.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants produce their food by using the sun's energy through a process called photosynthesis.
 We make our houses and our clothes from plants, most of the food we eat is from plants, and without plants, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaur was the top predator of its time, it feared nothing, except other Mosasaurs.
 His long jaws were equipped with more than 70 sharp razor-like teeth, as well as a supplementary set of teeth in the palate, so that anything that crossed his path could not escape.
 We're not sure, but it's possible that he had a forked tongue, and his diet consisted of tortoises, large fish, and possibly even other mosasaurs.
 He also attacked anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like a T. rex.
 Although the Romans consumed foods that we know, they ate some strange or unusual dishes, including wild boar, peacocks, snails, and the lobster, a kind of rodent.
 Another difference is that while the poor and the woman ate their food sitting on chairs, the rich men liked to have banquets where they reclined on couches while they ate.
 The foods of ancient Rome could not include these foods of American or Asian origin that were introduced to Europe centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize, nor tomatoes, nor potatoes, nor cacao, and no ancient Roman ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a principal temple which was considered the deity's home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods, and priests tried to meet the needs of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard, then an inner sanctuary to which only the priests could go.
 Some pyramid-shaped towers, the ziggurats, were sometimes built as elements of a temple.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The major part of the Hebrew family's life took place outdoors.
 The women cooked in the courtyard, the shops were only open counters opening on to the street, and the houses were built of stone.
 As there were no great forests in the land of Canaan, wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland has been sparsely populated. In the Scandinavian Sagas, it is told that Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder,
 But, regardless of its discovery, Esquimaux tribes had already been living there at the time.
 Although each country is Scandinavian, there are many differences between the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you may think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, this is not true. Although there is an inscription on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of independence, one could read the words, Declaration of independence original dated July 4, 1776.
 Although no one really knows who wrote it, at an early stage of its existence, the great parchment, which measures about 29 and three-quarters inches by 24 inches, was rolled up.
 It is therefore likely that the notation was added simply as a label.
 The D-Day landings and the battles that followed liberated the North of France, but the South was still not free.
 It was ruled by the French of Vichy, the French who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and collaborated with the occupier instead of confronting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies landed in the South of France, an invasion called Operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, the Americans and the French had liberated the South of France and were heading towards Germany.
 A civilization is a singular culture shared by a large group of people who live and work in cooperation, a society.
 The word civilization is derived from the Latin word civilis, which means civil and is related to the Latin words civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state and also indicates, in some sense, the size of the society to which it refers.
 The city-states are the precursors of the nation, a civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a durable cultural imprint and a fair diffusion.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces and are not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen States first formed a weak central government, the Congress being its only component, under the Articles of Confederation.
 The Congress had no power to impose taxes, and as there was no executive or judicial power at the national level, it relied on the authorities of the States, which were often reluctant to enforce its acts.
 He also had no power to waive the laws on taxation or to change the tariffs between the States.
 The articles required unanimous consent from all the states before they could be amended, and the states took the central government so lightly that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, with the German national football team, the second most successful national football team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One.
 Winter sports are the most popular in the northern regions, with Italians participating in international games and Olympic events.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu,
 Because of the group of Islands that make it up, Japan is often referred to, from a geographical point of view, as an archipelago.
 The first information about Taiwan dates back to the fifteenth century, while European navigators passing by it mentioned it under the name of Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base in the South-West of Taiwan, introducing a transformation of the indigenous cereal production practices and employing Chinese workers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared it a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after its defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war, the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, by which it ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is composed of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings that surround the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of what they looked like.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and that restoration continues to this day.
 For example, the most common photography format in the world is 35 mm film, which was the most common film format at the end of the analogue era.
 It's still made today, but what's important is that its image format is inherited from the format of the Digital camera's sensor.
 The format 35mm is in fact, and this is quite disconcerting, 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 As a result, the ratio of the width to height is three to two.
 Many common formats, such as the APS family, for example, are equal to this aspect ratio or are close to it.
 The third-party rule, which has been so badly abused and often ridiculed, is a simple directive that stimulates dynamism while offering protection to the image.
 He indicates that the most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into thirds vertically and horizontally.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, was questioned.
 For more than a thousand years, the Christian religion has linked European States together, despite differences in language and custom.
 His omnipresent power touched everyone from the King to the lowest of the people.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary funds are there specifically for that reason.
 The central authority of the church had been in Rome for over 1000 years, and this concentration of power and money led many people to question whether this doctrine was being upheld.
 Soon after the beginning of the war, Britain put in place a naval blockade of Germany.
 This strategy proved effective, cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated generally accepted international law and was codified by several international agreements over the last two centuries.
 Britain mined the international waters to prevent ships from venturing into entire maritime zones, thereby posing a threat even to neutral ships.
 As this tactic only elicited a timid reaction, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted U-Boat warfare.
 During the 20s, most citizens and nations showed a penchant for pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, nations have wished to avoid such a situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to take a job at the Edison company in New York.
 He arrived in the United States with four hundred dollars, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 Ancient China had a unique way of showing the different eras, each step of China or each family that was in power was a different dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also an unstable age of divided provinces, the most well-known of which is the age of the Three Kingdoms, which lasted for 60 years between the Han and the Jin dynasties.
 During these periods, fierce struggles took place between many of the nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China, with thousands of people dying in battle to sit on the throne of the great Xi'an Palace.
 There are many social and political repercussions such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single leader.
 Also, after the Revolution, the trades were opened to all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and the most talented to succeed.
 The same is true of the Army, for the ranking of the armies is no longer based on class, but on caliber.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working-class people in other countries to begin their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in questions that went beyond the limits of this worldly life.
 The cave itself, which has survived to the present day, gives a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 Situated at the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, the cave is totally isolated from the rest of the world.
 In reality, it's not easy at all to find, even though we know it exists.
 Above, one can contemplate nothing but the clear and magnificent sky and the numerous surrounding mountains.
 The great pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders that still exists today.
 Built by the Egyptians during the third millennium BC, the great pyramid is one of many giant structures erected in honor of the pharaohs who had died.
 The plateau of Giza, or Giza Necropolis, in the Valley of the Kings, Egypt, is home to several pyramids, including the great pyramid, several smaller tombs, a number of temples, and the great Sphinx.
 The great pyramid was created to honor the pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor his wives and other members of his family.
 The push symbol looks like a V and the pull symbol looks like a staple or a square with the bottom side missing.
 The top means you start with the point and push the bow, and the bottom means you start with the frog and pull the bow.
 A bow held upright generally produces a softer sound, while a bow held down produces a louder, more assertive tone.
 Feel free to write your own marks in pencil, but remember that the printed bow marks are for a musical purpose, and so should generally be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, the King, Marie-Antoinette, their two young children, Marie-Thérèse, 11, and Louis-Charles, 4, and the King's sister, Marie-Antoinette,
 In a carriage, they are driven back to Paris, surrounded by a crowd of people who shout and scream threats against the King and the queen.
 The King and the queen were obliged, because of the crowd, to have the windows of their carriages opened.
 At one point, a member of the crowd brandished the head of a Royalist guard killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The war expenses of American imperialism in conquering the Philippines were paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They have been forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and interest on bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government by Wall Street banking houses.
 Naturally, the super profits resulting from the prolonged exploitation of the Philippine people could constitute the fundamental advantages of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the creation of the order.
 These events took place during what is generally considered the High Middle Ages, a period of European history that spanned from the eleventh to the thirteenth centuries.
 The Middle Ages were preceded by the Early Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages, which by convention ends around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas in practice, ranging from technological push or technological imperative to a strict sense in which the destiny of humanity is dictated by an underlying logic related to scientific laws and their manifestation in technologies.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism agree on two general ideas: Technological development itself proceeds according to a process that transcends cultural and political influences, and technology has an intrinsic rather than a social impact on the societies it shapes.
 For example, one could argue that the automobile leads necessarily to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a handful of cars, which is why new methods of production are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The massive ownership of cars also leads to a greater incidence of road accidents, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the field of health care to treat the resulting injuries.
 The romanticism presented an important element of cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 According to the theories of Romanticism, geography would have shaped individuals and, with time, customs and a culture related to this geography would have emerged,
 In the same way that Paris is known as the fashion capital of the contemporary world, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 Its reputation as the epicenter of luxury began around the year 400, and lasted until about 1100.
 His status declined during the twelfth century, mainly because the Crusaders returned laden with gifts such as silk and spices, with which the Byzantine markets could hardly compete.
 At this time, the title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style peaked between the tenth and eleventh centuries, and the fourteenth.
 At first, the dress was heavily influenced by the Byzantine culture to the east.
 However, due to the slowness of communication, Western modes could be accused of a 25 to 30 years delay.
 During the late Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest advances of the time, following the Crusades, was the use of buttons to fasten clothing.
 Subsistence agriculture is a form of agriculture practiced to produce enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 And subsistence farming is a simple system, often biological, using seed that's been conserved originally from the ecoregion, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize the yield.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence agriculture, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures bring together individuals who feel neglected by societal norms and who share the same ideas, allowing them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures may be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location, and or the gender of the members.
 The criteria which determine a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their belonging by distinctive and symbolic use of style, which encompasses fashions, manners, and slang.
 One of the most common ways of illustrating the importance of socialization is to draw on the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune, or voluntary abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their childhood.
 These children are considered as ferocious or savage, and some of them have been imprisoned by people, usually their own parents,
 The feral children may have suffered severe abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some would have been raised by animals, some would have lived alone in the wilderness.
 When they are fully raised by Non-Human species, the children display almost identical behavioral traits to those of the animals that raised them, such as fear or indifference to humans.
 And while project-based learning should make learning easier and more interesting, the support goes even further.
 Support is not a method of learning but rather a way to help learners who are discovering a new teaching such as the use of a new program or the beginning of a new project.
 Supports can be both virtual and real, meaning a teacher is one form of support, but the little man in Microsoft office is another.
 The virtual scaffoldings are integrated into the software and are designed to question, guide and explain procedures that might otherwise have been too difficult for the student to manage alone.
 The children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse,
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment that is not stimulating, nurturing and educational, but that is the case.
 We perceive the family placement system as a zone of safety for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 The placement in a foster home is supposed to provide all the necessities that were lacking in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet combines elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of approach to uses and gratifications.
 For example, learning and socialization are considered to be major factors in the use of the Internet.
 The personal involvement and the ongoing relationships have also been identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied the public's reactions to web sites.
 The use of Video-Recording has led to great discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, that is, facial expressions lasting only a few milliseconds.
 It is claimed that one can detect if a person is lying by correctly interpreting micro expressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article, The President's Speech, indicated how people with brain damage can nevertheless evaluate sincerity with precision.
 He even suggests that such capacities for interpreting human behaviour may be found in animals such as domestic dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two reservoirs of genetic variation,
 The mutation adds a new genetic variation, and selection removes it from the reserve of expressed variations.
 Segregation and recombination alternate the variations between the two basins at each generation.
 In the savanna, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans to satisfy its needs in amino acids from the vegetable resources available.
 In addition, an absence of reaction has serious consequences: growth disorders, malnutrition and, in the end, death.
 The most easily accessible vegetable foods would be the proteins contained in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to digest for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, food of animal origin, such as ants, termites, and eggs, is easy to digest while providing a great deal of protein.
 All things considered, we shouldn't be surprised if our own ancestors solved their protein problem in much the same way that chimpanzees in the Savanna do today.
 The interruption of sleep is the process of waking up intentionally during your period of sleep and then falling asleep again shortly afterward.
 This can be done easily by using a relatively quiet alarm clock, so that you can wake up without fully waking.
 If you find yourself resetting the clock during your sleep, it may be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 The other biological based possibilities include drinking a lot of liquids before going to bed, particularly water or tea, which are reputed to be diuretics,
 The degree of inner peace a person has is inversely proportional to the degree of tension in his or her body and mind.
 The more tension is low, the more vital force is positive, and every person has the possibility of finding absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment, the only thing that stands in the way of this is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been enriched by the Mahayana path of love and by many techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple, consisting of Kundalini Yoga, meditation, and the way of universal love.
 With Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras and visualisations.
 The center of Tibetan meditation is the yoga of the deity, and it is through the visualization of different deities that the channels of energy are cleansed, the chakras activated, and the awakened consciousness created.
 Germany was an enemy during World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the United States. At the end of the war, deep conflicts between their different systems, methods, and cultures ended the alliance between these two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies became enemies and the cold war began.
 It was to last for the next 40 years and would see real affronts, through armies of substitution, on battlefields in Africa, in Asia, in Afghanistan, in Cuba, and in many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize along the Romanian bridgehead.
 But these plans became obsolete almost from day to day, when more than 800,000 Soviet Army troops arrived and created the Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the eastern regions of Poland, thus violating the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties.
 The use of ships for the transportation of goods is by far the most efficient way to move large quantities of people and goods across the oceans.
 The work of the marines traditionally has been to ensure that your country maintains the ability to move your people and your goods, while interfering with the ability of your enemy to move his people and his goods.
 One of the most remarkable examples of this situation was the North Atlantic campaign during World War II, when the Americans were trying to get troops and supplies across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mainly U-Boats, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would probably have conquered Britain as it had conquered the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Cultures and ancient tribes began to keep them close by for easy access to milk, wool, meat, and skins.
 Domestic goats were generally kept in herds that wandered on the hills or other grazing areas, often tended by shepherds who were mostly children or teenagers, a term more familiar to us today.
 Wagonways were built in England as early as the sixteenth century.
 Although the ways for wagons were simply made of parallel wooden planks, they allowed the horses that drew them to reach greater speeds and to pull heavier loads than on the slightly more accidental roads of the day.
 The croisillons were introduced early on to maintain the tracks in place, but it was soon realized that the tracks would be more efficient if they were equipped with a strip of iron on the top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first iron rails made their appearance.
 The first means of locomotion was walking,
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecines, did not walk upright as usual.
 We find bipedal specialisations in the fossils of Australopithecus from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as seven million years ago.
 We can start by living in better harmony with the environment, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even militate to lessen the suffering of the future.
 In many cases, it is a symptomatic treatment, however, if we do not want only a temporary solution, we must find the root of the problems and deactivate them.
 It is clear that the world has changed a great deal thanks to the scientific and technological advances made by human beings, and that the problems have become more serious as a result of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of humanity.
 After its adoption by the Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was then sent to a few streets away, to the printing shop of John Dunlap.
 During the night, between 150 and 200 were made, today known as the Dunlap Broadsides.
 The first public reading of the document was made by John Nixon in the courtyard of independence hall on July 8.
 One of them was sent to George Washington on the 6th of July, which he read to his troops in New York on the 9th of August.
 The 25 Dunlap sheets, of which we still have copies, are the earliest surviving copies of the document.
 Many paleontologists today think that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still alive today.
 Few people consider them dinosaurs, given that they have wings and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have feet covered with scales and equipped with claws, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs like T-Rex.
 Virtually all computers in use today are based on the manipulation of information that is coded in Binary form.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, 0 or 1, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or bits, to use the computer jargon.
 An internal poisoning may not be visible immediately, symptoms such as vomiting are sufficiently general that an immediate diagnosis cannot be made.
 The best indicator of internal poisoning is probably the presence of an open container of toxic household chemicals or drugs.
 Consult the label for specific first aid instructions.
 The term insect is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from an ancient familiarity with bedbugs, which are insects that are highly adapted to parasitize humans.
 The nests, like the bedbugs, are nidicolous, that is, adapted to live in the nest or the habitat of their host.
 In the United States, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the leading neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women are two to three times more likely to have multiple sclerosis than men.
 A couple may well decide that it is not in their interest, nor in the interest of the child, to be involved in the upbringing of a baby.
 These couples may choose to make an adoption plan for their baby.
 In the case of adoption, the biological parents terminate their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main goal of science is to understand how the world works using the scientific method, which guides most scientific research.
 This is not the only experiment, however, an experiment is a test that serves to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses, to ask questions and to make observations, but also to guide scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on the ancient texts, and in particular, on the Bible in Latin.
 Aristotle's opinions on all scientific questions, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the decline of Greek, the West found itself cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many rhythms observed in physiology and behavior often depend in large part on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not simply responses to periodic external stimuli, have been documented in most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue a cycle of functioning for a certain period even in the absence of external stimulation.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the main indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages, or viruses, to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They conducted two experiments to mark either the phage's DNA with a radioactive phosphorus, or the phage's protein with radioactive sulphur.
 Mutations can have many different effects depending on the type of mutation, the size of the part of the genetic material affected, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only the changes in the germ cells can be transmitted to the children, while other changes may result in the death of the cells or cancer.
 Ecotourism involves people who want to visit natural areas in order to enjoy the scenery, especially wildlife.
 Hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and studying the ecosystem are all examples of on-site activities.
 We can go and see, photograph, and discover the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns in cars to go to their place of work and they meet other people who are going to work in the small towns they have just left.
 In this dynamic transportation system, everyone is in some way linked to a system based on private cars and supports it.
 Science now shows that this carbon-based economy has dislodged the biosphere from its state of stability that has supported human evolution for two million years.
 Everyone is part of the society and uses the transportation systems.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear so many complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems generate such complaints, why do they break down daily? Are transport engineers simply incompetent, or is there something more fundamental going on?
 The flow of traffic is the study of the movements of drivers and vehicles between two points, and the interactions they have with each other.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the flow of traffic because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to act within a reasonably coherent range, so traffic flows tend to have a reasonable coherence and can be represented mathematically in an approximate way.
 To better represent the traffic flow, relationships have been established between the three main characteristics: (1) the throughput, (2) the density and (3) the speed.
 These relationships help with the planning, design, and operation of roadway facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly, and their ability to fly allowed them to escape from predators more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along the body.
 This gives them a greater number of small places to hide in from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are the dragon flies and the mayflies.
 A few thousand years ago, a man called Aristarchus claimed that the solar system was moving around the sun.
 Some thought he was right, but many believed the opposite, that the solar system, including the sun, was moving around the earth.
 This seems reasonable, because the earth doesn't seem to be moving, does it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest river on earth, carrying eight times the volume of water that the second largest river carries.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, sometimes reaching 10 kilometers wide.
 As much as twenty percent of the water that flows from the Amazon into the ocean comes from the Amazon.
 The main arm of the Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long. It collects water from thousands of small rivers.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size and the excellence of their construction.
 The Egyptians of the New Kingdom were amazed at the monuments of their predecessors, which were then more than a thousand years old.
 The Vatican is the smallest independent country in the world, and the least populated.
 The Vatican City State issues its own stamps, currency, and passports.
 Italian is also the everyday language used by most people who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 The citizens of the Vatican city are all Catholics.
 Since ancient times, people have been familiar with the basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper, because they are found in the natural world in a raw state and are quite simple to mine using primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, theorized that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of the four elements, which were earth, water, air, and fire.
 Rather, it was the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas and plasma, although he also put forward the theory that these latter transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals. Remember, the periodic table contains many elements.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered to be metals, although there are also metals like silver and gold.
 We also find alloys that include a small amount of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, and all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that billions of them could fit into the period at the end of this sentence.
 The pencil was a good friend to many people when it first came out.
 Unfortunately, the advent of new writing styles has relegated the pen to a more confidential status and to a few more rare uses.
 People write messages nowadays on computer screens without ever having to approach a pencil.
 One can only wonder what the keyboard will become when the next new thing comes along.
 The fission bomb works on the principle of assembling a nucleus of a myriad of protons and neutrons.
 It's a bit like trying to get a heavy cart up a steep hill by splitting the core again, and then releasing some of that energy.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, so they tend to break apart with little or no pressure.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 kilometers on the visible side and 100 kilometers on the hidden side.
 It is thinner at the level of the seas and thicker under the continents.
 There may be more Maria on the near side because the crust is thinner and it was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Theories of content are focused on the search for what makes people feel good or what they are attracted to.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and or desires that have been internalized as they matured towards adulthood.
 These theories examine what drives some people to want the things they do and what drives some people to want the things they do or not to want the things they do.
 Two theories of popular content are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, two behaviors can emerge when a manager becomes the boss of former colleagues, one being to try and remain the good cop.
 This type of manager has a hard time making unpopular decisions, taking disciplinary action, making evaluations, delegating responsibilities, and holding others accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, one becomes a completely unrecognizable individual who feels that he or she must change everything that the group has created up to that point and do things in his or her own way.
 After all, the chief is ultimately responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to dissension between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 The virtual teams are held to the same standards of excellence as the conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Members of a virtual team often function as the point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The presence of a real invisible team is also a unique element of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team to which each member renders an account.
 Why would an organization want to go through the tedious process of creating a learning structure?
 When all the available resources are used effectively in the functional services of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can be fully expressed.
 Therefore, the process of an organization working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the customer's need.
 Before an organization can be innovative, its leadership must create a culture of innovation, shared knowledge, and its own culture of learning.
 Angel (2006) presents the Continuum approach as a method used to help organizations achieve better results.
 Neurobiological data provide material evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, and therefore allow us to narrow the field of research and make it much more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 We have long known that different types of brain damage, injury, tumors, and trauma affect behavior and cause changes in certain mental functions.
 The rise of new technologies allows us to see and study brain structures and processes that were never seen before.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to construct simulation models that help us to understand the processes in our mind.
 Although artificial intelligence is often heavily connoted with science fiction, it represents a very important part of computer science, which studies the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Research in artificial intelligence aims to automate tasks requiring intelligent approaches.
 Among the examples are control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to diagnostics and customer questions, as well as recognition of writing, voice and face.
 These practices led to distinct disciplines, focused on providing solutions to the problems of everyday life.
 The IA system is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as it has been implemented in several home computer and video game software.
 Field trips are an integral part of any school class. Often, a teacher would like to take his or her students to places where a bus trip is not feasible.
 The solution is being brought by technology in the form of virtual field trips, where students can look at museum objects, visit an aquarium, or admire a beautiful work of art while sitting with their class.
 Participating in a virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share your experiences with future generations.
 For example, students at Bennet high school in North Carolina design a Website each year about their visit to the state capital, and each year the Website is updated, but the older versions are kept Online as an Archive.
 Blogs can also help students to improve their writing skills, even though students often try the Blog experience with negligent grammar and spelling.
 As the students are often the most critical audience, the author of the Blog begins to strive for better writing to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also forces students to be more aware of the world around them.
 Blogs are a tool that stimulates collaboration and encourages students to extend their learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 When used well, Blogs can help students to strengthen their analysis and critical thinking skills.
 Ottawa is the charming bilingual capital of Canada and has a large number of art galleries and museums that showcase the past and present of Canada.
 You'll find Niagara falls to the South and the region of Muskoka and its surroundings to the North, which have a pristine natural beauty.
 All of these measures, and many more, make Ontario what foreigners consider the quintessence of Canada.
 There are large areas to the North which are sparsely populated and some are almost uninhabited.
 For a comparison of the population, which is surprising to many, there are more African-Americans living in the United States than there are Canadian citizens.
 The Islands of East Africa are located in the Indian ocean, off the coast of East Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest country, and even a continent unto itself, when it comes to fauna.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent, or associated with France, and are known for being luxury resorts.
 The Arabs also brought the practice of Islam to the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the fifteenth century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco de Gama discovered the Cape route connecting Europe to India.
 To the North, the region is bounded by the Sahel, and to the South and West by the Atlantic ocean.
 To women: It is recommended that any woman who travels should say that she is married, regardless of her marital status.
 It is also advisable to wear a wedding ring, which should not be too precious.
 Women must realize that certain cultural differences can lead to behaviors that they consider to be harassment, such as being followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in the refusal of men's advances, and do not be afraid to stand your ground.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merinids as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese, who had destroyed and rebuilt it, baptizing it Casa Branca, finally abandoned it in 1755 after an earthquake.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city under the name of Daru l-Badya, and it was renamed Casablanca by the Spanish traders who established trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places in all of Morocco for shopping.
 Around the old medina, one can easily find places where to buy traditional Moroccan products, such as tagines, pottery, leather goods, narguilés and all sorts of trinkets, but that's it for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town situated at the extreme East of the Democratic Republic of Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, in particular the downtown.
 Although Goma is reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma must be researched to understand the state of the fighting that continues in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of Nyiragongo volcano as well as for gorilla treks among the cheapest in Africa.
 You can use boda-boda's to get around Goma. The normal price is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combined with its relative inaccessibility, Tombouctou has become a metaphor for distant and exotic lands.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, although its reputation as a tourist attraction brings in some revenue.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of World Heritage in Danger, due to the threat of desert sands.
 It was one of the main stops on Henry Louis Gates's PBS show, Wonders of the African-American world.
 The city contrasts strongly with the rest of the country, as it possesses a more Arabic than African style.
 The Kruger National Park lies in the northeast of South Africa and borders Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The total area of the park is 19,500 square kilometres, divided into 14 ecozones, each with its own specific fauna.
 It is one of the most well-known amusement parks in South Africa and is considered the flagship of South African National Parks.
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily entrance and conservation fees for the park.
 It can be advantageous to get a Wildcard which gives access to some of the parks in South Africa, as well as to all the South African National parks.
 Hong Kong Island gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong and is the main centre of interest for many tourists.
 The row of buildings that defines the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a scintillating bar graph that reflects in the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To admire the most beautiful panoramas of Hong Kong, leave the island and go to the waterfront of Kowloon, located opposite.
 The vast majority of Hong Kong's urban development is concentrated on the North shore.
 And the place that the British colonists have invested in, so it seems like a good place to start if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past.
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest coastal mangrove forest, extending 80 kilometers from the coast to the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland.
 The Sundarbans have been designated a UNESCO world heritage site, and the part of the forest located in the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are not composed solely of Mangrove swamps: they also contain some of the last remnants of the majestic jungles which once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 square kilometres, of which about one third is covered by water.
 Sundarbans is a nature reserve since 1966, you can find there about 400 Royal Bengal tigers and 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave from the interdistrict bus station on the other side of the river all day long, but most, especially those that go to the east and Jakar/Bumthang, leave between 6:30 and 7:30 in the morning.
 The inter-district buses are often full, so it is advised to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the districts are served by small Japanese cabotage steamers, which are comfortable and robust.
 The taxi collective is a quick and comfortable way to get to nearby places, such as Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The Oyapock bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oyapock River to connect the cities of Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 meters high, 378 meters long, and have two 3.50-meter-wide lanes.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters, and the structure was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational by September 2017, when Brazilian customs posts are expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní were the largest indigenous group living in what is now eastern Paraguay, living as semi-nomadic hunters and also practising a form of agriculture.
 Other indigenous tribes that peopled the Chaco, such as the Guaycurú or the Payaguá, survived mainly by fishing, hunting, or gathering.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, once called the giant province of the Indies, was born out of the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish inaugurated the period of colonization, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve a large part of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams and among the best players of polo in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo grounds of Las Cañitas.
 In addition, tournaments and lesser matches are sometimes held here at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches, visit the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to the British pound sterling.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank in the Islands, located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 The pound sterling is a commonly accepted currency throughout the Islands, while in Stanley, credit cards and U S . dollars are also commonly accepted.
 On the neighbouring Islands, credit cards are unlikely to be accepted, even though British and American currencies may be.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the money of the Falklands outside the Islands, so change it before you leave.
 Montevideo, being situated south of the equator, winter in the northern hemisphere corresponds to summer there.
 Montevideo is located in a subtropical zone and summer temperatures exceeding 30 °C are common.
 The winters can be deceptively cold, with temperatures rarely falling below zero, but the wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no real seasons of rain and of drought.
 Although many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans, it is still a wildlife sanctuary, and visitors are asked not to feed or disturb the animals.
 According to the park authorities, you must stay at least 100 metres away from bears and wolves, and 25 metres away from all other wild animals.
 As docile as they may appear, the bison, the deer, the moose, the bear, and almost all the great animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they have not kept a sufficient distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so give them space.
 In addition, be aware that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid carrying or cooking odorous foods and keep the camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, located on the island of Upolu, with a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the site of a notorious naval standoff in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All the ships were sunk, except for a British cruiser, and nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 The Supreme Chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, was assassinated during a peaceful rally in the city, during the Mau movement.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is situated on two harbours, and the most popular are found in three areas.
 The beaches of the North Shore (in the North Harbour district) are on the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Almost all beaches are sandy and allow for safe swimming, and most are shaded by pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are on the Waitemata harbour, in the chic suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 These beaches, sometimes very crowded by families, have many shops along the shore, and bathing is safe.
 The main local beer is Number One, a fairly ordinary but tasty and refreshing beer.
 There are many French wines to be tasted, but New Zealand and Australian wines may travel better.
 You can drink the local tap water without danger, but you can easily find bottled water if you have any concerns about it.
 For Australians, the idea of a caf latte is foreign, a short black is an espresso, the cappuccino is filled with cream, not foam, and tea is served without milk.
 The hot chocolate is in line with Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive but excellent.
 Numerous trips to the reef are made throughout the year, and injuries from one of these causes on the reef are rare.
 Nevertheless, follow the advice of the authorities, obey all the signs, and pay particular attention to the safety warnings.
 From October to April, north of 1770, the jellyfish-boxes arrive near the beaches and the mouths of rivers.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans, most of them are afraid of humans and would stay away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not actively live in the ocean, their main habitat is in the estuaries of rivers north of Rockhampton.
 The advance reservation gives the traveler peace of mind knowing that he or she will have a place to sleep once they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with specific hotels, but you can also book through travel agencies other types of accommodation, like camping grounds.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even a combination of the flight and the accommodation.
 They may also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get other documents necessary for your destination, such as a visa.
 Any modification or request must however be addressed to the travel agency first and not directly to the hotel.
 At music festivals, the majority of participants decide to camp on site, and most consider this to be an integral part of the experience.
 If you want to participate in the musical event, you'll have to arrive early to find a good camping spot.
 And remember, even though the main music shows are over on the main stages, there are still other music shows going on late into the night at other festival sites.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you're crossing the Baltic in winter, be sure to check the location of the hut, as the ice crossing can make a lot of noise at the most exposed huts.
 Cruises to St . Petersburg include time spent in the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement.
 Casinos generally make a lot of effort to maximize the time and money spent by customers, and you rarely find windows and clocks, and the exits can be difficult to spot.
 They typically offer special deals on food, drinks and entertainment in order to keep the guests happy and to keep them on the premises.
 On some sites, it's the locals who offer free alcoholic beverages, but the intoxication of alcohol impairs judgment, and all good players know that it's crucial to stay sober.
 Anyone who travels by car to high latitudes or crosses mountain passes must consider the possibility of snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On icy and snowy roads, friction is low and you cannot drive as if you were on bare asphalt.
 During a blizzard, it can snow enough in a very short time to block you.
 Visibility may also be limited by snow or dust storms, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 On the other hand, the presence of ice and snow is normal in many countries, and traffic is practically uninterrupted all year round.
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable moment for many visitors.
 In common parlance, the term safari denotes a trip to Africa, and in particular to the savannah, for the purpose of observing wild animals in their native habitat.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to come close to vehicles and the standard equipment allows for good viewing.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and you will see them better with binoculars.
 A safari on foot, also called a brousse walk, footing, or a walking safari, consists of hiking, either for a few hours or for several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic summer games, after having hosted the games in 1964.
 If you have booked your flights and accommodation in 2020 before the announcement of the postponement, you may be faced with a tricky situation.
 The cancellation policies vary, but as of late March, most of the cancellation policies based on the Coronavirus did not extend until July 2020, the date at which the Olympics were scheduled to be held.
 Ticket prices are expected to range between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with typical tickets costing around 7,000 yen.
 By hanging wet clothes to dry, one can make them dry more easily. Many hotels have an iron and an ironing board that can be borrowed even if there isn't one in the rooms.
 If you don't have an iron or if you don't feel like wearing ironed socks, you can try using a hair dryer.
 Avoid letting the fabric overheat, which can cause it to shrink or in extreme cases, burn.
 There are different methods of water purification, some of which are more effective against specific threats.
 In some localities, it is sufficient to boil the water for a minute, in others, it is necessary to boil it for several minutes.
 The efficiency of filters varies, and if you have a problem, you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter pests that they are not used to in their home region.
 Parasites can contaminate food, cause irritation, or in the worst cases, cause allergic reactions, spread venom, or transmit infections.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill people by force, are generally not considered parasites.
 In some localities, the out-of-tax shops present an opportunity to buy goods exempt from taxes and excise duties.
 Travellers to countries with high taxes can sometimes make considerable savings, particularly on items such as alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmont has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway, frequently passing through isolated areas of the back country.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, keep an open mind: steep grades, narrow lanes and tight curves are the norm.
 The speed limits posted are significantly lower than in the preceding and following sections, generally 35 to 40 mph, and their strict enforcement is even more important than in the preceding and following sections.
 On the other hand, the mobile service is curiously much stronger here than on many other parts of the route, for example, the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are rather good, and in Bavaria, they are very rich and varied, similar to those of their neighbor to the South, Austria.
 Fruit tarts are a staple: apples are baked and cooked all year round, while cherries and plums pop up in summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts.
 If you want small but copious pastries, try the Berlin balls, also called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish made with herbs and spices, accompanied by meat or vegetables.
 A curry dish can be either solid or liquid, depending on the amount of sauce it contains.
 In the interior regions of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in the south of India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesia, with its 17,000 Islands, is a generic term that covers a wide variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 However, when used without other qualifying terms, it tends to refer to foods from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, Javanese cuisine offers a range of dishes simply seasoned, the predominant flavors that the Javanese favor being peanuts, chilies, sugar, and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are foot rests for the rider, which hang from each side of the saddle.
 They offer a greater stability to the user, but they can pose a security problem: in fact, the user's feet can get stuck in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he or she could be dragged if the horse were to run away.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, narrow sole.
 Then, some saddles, notably the English, have safety bars which allow a stirrup to fall off the saddle if it is pulled backwards by a rider who falls.
 Valley of Cochamó, the destination of excellence for climbing in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America, with many great granite walls and cliffs.
 From the summits, the views of the mountains are unobstructed.
 Downhill winter sports, notably skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that consist of sliding down a snowy slope with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is a major travel activity that counts many aficionados, sometimes called ski bums, who organize their entire vacations around skiing in specific locations.
 The idea of skiing is very ancient: some cave paintings showing skiers date back to 5,000 BC.
 The practice of alpine skiing as a sport dates back at least to the seventeenth century, the first skiing club was founded in 1861 in Australia by Norwegians.
 Skiing: This activity is also called Nordic skiing, cross-country skiing, or backcountry skiing.
 This is similar to alpine touring, as well as alpine climbing, without incorporating these activities, which are generally practiced on rougher terrain and require the use of much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions, you will be able to cover a little bit more distance than on foot, but you will rarely reach the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries, so in a typical situation, travelling through several countries would mean having to apply for several visas and undergo several passport checks.
 The Schengen area, however, functions a bit like a single country in this regard.
 So long as you remain within this zone, you can generally travel across the borders without having to go through passport control.
 Similarly, having a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply separately for a visa to each of the Schengen countries, which saves time, money and administrative effort.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax authorities define antiques as objects over 100 years old.
 The criteria vary according to the place where one is located, in some parts of the world, like in North America, the age limit may be lower than in Europe.
 Handmade items may be considered antiques, even if they are less old than similar industrial products.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important source of livelihood for the Sami, and the culture that surrounds this trade is of great importance to many other professions.
 Even though, according to tradition, all Sami people were not involved in large-scale reindeer herding, they lived off fishing, hunting and other similar activities, while using reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Sámi people work in modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in Sámi Lapland.
 Although widely used, particularly among non-Roms, the term Gitan is often considered pejorative because of its association with negative stereotypes and a misrepresented image of the Roma.
 If the country you are visiting has a travel warning issued by your government, your travel insurance or your travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also seek advice from other governments, but their advice is tailored to their citizens.
 As an example, American citizens in the Middle East might be confronted with situations different from those of Europeans or Arabs.
 The opinions are only a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The opinions presented are often superficial, general, and oversimplified in relation to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Violent weather is the generic term for any dangerous meteorological phenomenon that may cause damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 The very unfavorable weather conditions can occur anywhere in the world, and they can be of several kinds, according to geographical, topographical, and atmospheric characteristics.
 Violent winds, hail, excessive rainfall and fires are forms and effects of severe weather, just like thunderstorms, tornadoes, sea spray and cyclones.
 Extreme weather phenomena, regional and seasonal, include cold snaps, blizzards, and dust storms.
 It is strongly advised that travellers check for the risks of bad weather that may affect their destination, knowing that this can have an impact on the routes they are considering.
 Anyone who is considering travelling to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A Google search for a course in a hostile environment will likely provide the address of a local business.
 A course will normally cover all the topics covered here in much more detail, usually with a practical experience.
 A training course normally lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid, and sometimes training in the use of weapons.
 The books and magazines dealing with survival in the wilderness are common, but publications dealing with war zones are few.
 Travellers who are planning a sex change operation abroad should ensure that they have valid documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports without gender indication varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents is all over the place.
 The searches at security checkpoints have also become much more intrusive in the post-September 11 era.
 Transgender people in the preoperative phase should not expect to pass through scanners while preserving their privacy and dignity.
 The rip currents are the currents that come back from the waves that break on the beach, often on a reef or equivalent.
 Due to the underwater topography, the return flow is concentrated in a few deeper sections, and a fast current can form in these deeper areas.
 In most cases, deaths are due to exhaustion from attempting to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, the return to swimming is no more difficult than usual.
 Essentially, try to aim for a spot where you won't be shot at again.
 The reintegration shock occurs earlier than the culture shock, lasts longer and can be more severe.
 Travellers who have had difficulty adapting to the new culture sometimes have a great deal of difficulty in readapting to their home culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you have already adapted to the new culture and have lost some of the habits of your home culture.
 At first, when you went abroad, people were probably patient and understanding, knowing that travelers in a new country must adapt.
 People may not anticipate that patience and understanding are also necessary for travelers returning home.
 The sound and light show at the pyramid is one of the most interesting attractions in the region for children.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see them in silence before the show begins.
 Usually, one hears the noise of tourists and vendors all the time, and the history of sound and light is like a history book.
 The Sphinx is placed as the backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are displayed on the pyramids, and the different pyramids are illuminated.
 The Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several nations and have the most number of research stations, sixteen of which are active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 kilometers to the North of the peninsula, and the largest island, King George Island, is home to the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Other examples include Livingston and Deception Islands, where the caldera of an active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth land is the southern region of the peninsula, bounded by the Bellingshausen sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, then reappear to form the Ellsworth mountain range, which is 360 kilometers long and crossed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel range, contains the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, which reaches a height of 4,892 m.
 In remote areas, without a cell phone network, you may have no other choice but to use satellite phone.
 A satellite phone generally does not replace a cell phone, because you have to be outside and have a clear view of the satellite to make a call.
 This is a service often used by shipping, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that have a need for remote data transmission and telephony.
 Your local telephone operator should be able to tell you more about connecting to this service.
 Those who plan a sabbatical year have the opportunity to learn while they travel, and more and more of them are choosing that option.
 This formula is particularly appreciated by young people who leave school, as it allows them to take a year off before going to university, without compromising their studies.
 Often, having taken a year off to study abroad can actually give you a better chance of getting into graduate school.
 As a rule, there are tuition fees to be paid for these educational programs.
 Finland is a popular destination for recreational boating, with thousands of lakes and thousands of islands in the country's lakes and coastal archipelagos.
 You don't necessarily need a yacht in the archipelagoes and on the lakes.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are large enough for a yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand are in the same situation, but apart from that, it is a unique case.
 Most Baltic cruises feature an extended stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can visit the historic city for a few days all in one go, and then return to the boat to sleep at night.
 If you're only going ashore with cruise excursions, you won't need a separate visa.
 The city of Berlin, Germany, is mentioned in some brochures for cruises. As you can see by consulting the map above, Berlin is not at all situated near the edge of the sea, and no visit to this city is included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying by airplane can be a scary experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if they've never flown before or have experienced a traumatic event.
 There is no shame in having fears and anxieties about things that many people feel.
 For some, understanding something about how planes work and what happens during a flight can help to overcome a fear that is based on the unknown or on not having control.
 The transportation companies are well-rewarded for making quick deliveries. In the case of an urgent repair, the question of time is crucial for the documents, goods, or spare parts that are involved.
 On some routes, large companies have their own planes, but on other routes and for small companies, there has been a problem.
 If they had sent goods by air freight, on certain routes, it would have taken days to clear customs and unload.
 The only way to get it there faster was to send it as registered baggage.
 The most obvious way to travel first or business class is to pay a large sum of money for this privilege,
 However, it's not cheap: as a rule, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for business class, and eleven times for first class.
 In general, it is useless to try to get reductions for seats in business or first class on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that they can count on a certain type of traveler who is willing to pay a high price for the privileges of speed and comfort, and they set their fares accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău, and the local language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that suffers from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the Transnistrian Republic in eastern Moldova, with its own government and currency, but recognised by no United Nations member state.
 Economic ties have been reestablished between these two parts of Moldova, despite the failure of political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 With a population of 3.7 million, Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, the second largest port after Istanbul, and an excellent hub.
 The ancient city of Smyrna is today a modern, developed, and thriving commercial center, located around a huge Bay, surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the glassy buildings and modern shopping centres are dotted with the red-tiled roofs of the eighteenth century market, and old mosques and churches, although the city has an atmosphere more Mediterranean than traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers views of the nearby Eysturoy Island and is home to an unusual octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting marble sculptures representing doves on some of the tombs.
 It is worth the while to walk around for half an hour in this fascinating village.
 The romantic and fascinating town of Sintra, situated to the north, is easily accessible and has been made famous abroad by the brilliant description of its splendor given by Lord Byron.
 Scotturb bus number 403 regularly runs to Sintra, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 In going North, do not miss the superb shrine of Our Lady of Fatima, a world-famous place for the apparitions of Mary.
 And don't forget that you're visiting essentially a charnel house, as well as a site that has an almost incalculable significance for a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many women and men alive who survived their stay here, and many others who saw their relatives murdered or killed by forced labour, Jews and non-Jews alike.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity, and respect it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by marking or scratching graffiti on the structures.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half of the population preferring to speak Catalan, a large majority understanding it, and virtually everyone being able to speak Spanish.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, as the law establishes that this is the first official language.
 Yet, Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other installations.
 Regular announcements in the metro are made only in Catalan, but unscheduled disruptions are announced by an automated system in many languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 The Parisians have a reputation for being egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 Although this stereotype is often inaccurate, the best way to get along in Paris remains to behave as well as possible, to act like someone who is well-bred.
 The abrupt exterior of the Parisians evaporates quickly if you show a minimum of courtesy.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is densely wooded, mainly of beech, fir and pine, and features a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 The country has a great variety of plant communities due to the diversity of its microclimates, soils, and elevation.
 The region is also home to a very wide variety of animals and birds.
 Rare animals such as the European Brown bear, the wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat and the great Tetra can be seen there, as well as many other common species.
 When visiting a monastery, women must wear skirts covering their knees and have their shoulders equally covered.
 Most monasteries provide stoles to women who arrive without anything, but if you bring your own, and it's in bright colors, you'll get a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 And men must wear pants that cover the knees.
 One can also borrow this garment from the stock at the entrance, but as it is not washed after each use, it may be that you do not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar Mediterranean areas, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork.
 A simple and popular dish, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato, and any other condiments available, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All names, followed by the word Sie, which means you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is a great way to distinguish between certain verbs and objects.
 One can also say that it facilitates reading, although the writing is somewhat complicated by the need to know if a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivized form.
 The pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian, because most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to watch out for are C and G, as their pronunciation varies depending on the vowel that follows.
 Please also make sure to pronounce the R and the RR in a distinct manner: Caro means dear, while Carro means chariot.
 Persian has a relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this introduction to the grammar would help you to learn a lot about Persian grammar and to better understand the sentences.
 It goes without saying that if you know a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, those who speak a little Spanish might hastily conclude that Portuguese is sufficiently close to it for it not to be necessary to study it separately.
 Pre-Modern observatories are generally obsolete today, and remain in place as museums or sites of education.
 As light pollution at the time was not as prevalent as it is today, they are generally located in cities or on college campuses, which are easier to access than those built in the modern era.
 Most of the modern research telescopes are huge infrastructures placed in remote regions where the atmospheric conditions are favorable.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the plum blossom was the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were held by the Emperor for himself and other members of the Imperial family.
 Plants look their best when they're in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even one.
 If you visit a strictly manicured garden, the taking of specimens will also get you kicked out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally considered to be an extremely safe place, where it is very easy to get around, and where you can buy almost anything you need once you arrive.
 But situated in the high tropics, only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to adapt to the heat and the strong sunshine, which is more rare when the sky is clear.
 There are also some buses that go North to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives.
 Check that the bus you are considering taking goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be an excellent theme for a vacation.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, or taking a cruise to interesting sites on the Danube or Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes for popular hiking trails and bicycle paths.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of the Christian religion, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 Many traditions related to these holidays have also been adopted by non-believers in Christian countries and by non-Christians worldwide.
 It is a tradition to spend the Easter night awake at a place in the open to see the sunrise.
 There are, of course, theological explanations for this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility rite.
 The more traditional churches often hold a Paschal vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, with the congregations often bursting into the party at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that have arrived on these Islands have done so originally by water, either by swimming or by being carried on floating objects, or by air.
 Because of the great distance separating them from the mainland, mammals have not been able to make the journey, and the giant tortoise is the main animal of the Galapagos.
 Since the arrival of humans in the Galapagos, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you may experience the polar night, during which the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 It's a good time to see the northern lights, as the sky will be dark almost all day.
 As the regions are sparsely populated, and light pollution is therefore often not a problem, you'll also be able to enjoy the stars.
 The Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than the one Westerners may be used to.
 The costumes are classic workwear, and employees are referred to by their last name or by their job title.
 Harmony at work is crucial, as it emphasizes the collective effort rather than the praise of individual achievements.
 Workers often have to get the approval of their superiors for any decision they make and are expected to obey their superiors without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.39041956673564265, 'precisions': [0.6899183455746584, 0.45785350400273983, 0.32653152548440506, 0.23857511131942816], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9857413009268925, 'length_ratio': 0.9858419966829821, 'translation_length': 24371, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 63.93595493924315, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8707498196851123, 'scores': [0.8336566090583801, 0.9050374031066895, 0.8988919258117676, 0.8250918984413147, 0.7755449414253235, 0.8087647557258606, 0.881408154964447, 0.8595348000526428, 0.8703437447547913, 0.955207109451294, 0.8862818479537964, 0.8193433880805969, 0.9235995411872864, 0.9044223427772522, 0.8956187963485718, 0.8251034617424011, 0.9059872031211853, 0.9165750741958618, 0.92079758644104, 0.8423665761947632, 0.9508944153785706, 0.9332996010780334, 0.8090874552726746, 0.7791783809661865, 0.8583922386169434, 0.9253457188606262, 0.8805001378059387, 0.8988552689552307, 0.81528639793396, 0.8975278735160828, 0.71053546667099, 0.8465095162391663, 0.8378316760063171, 0.9080868363380432, 0.9590299725532532, 0.865359902381897, 0.7860035300254822, 0.9039488434791565, 0.859254777431488, 0.7797639966011047, 0.7613921761512756, 0.9327250123023987, 0.8868435025215149, 0.927580714225769, 0.8895049095153809, 0.7845069766044617, 0.8766219615936279, 0.897209107875824, 0.9078320264816284, 0.9006357789039612, 0.9268538355827332, 0.9260786175727844, 0.9197314381599426, 0.911980926990509, 0.9162854552268982, 0.8844085335731506, 0.8829911947250366, 0.8756841421127319, 0.9209299683570862, 0.8590132594108582, 0.8480769991874695, 0.9234485626220703, 0.8742086291313171, 0.9158181548118591, 0.8516539931297302, 0.858186662197113, 0.8439565896987915, 0.6531453132629395, 0.9322981238365173, 0.8744097352027893, 0.8504878878593445, 0.886540949344635, 0.8721278309822083, 0.7972765564918518, 0.836982786655426, 0.8596823215484619, 0.8811083436012268, 0.9206159710884094, 0.9180982112884521, 0.9044070839881897, 0.902641236782074, 0.9165334701538086, 0.8747230172157288, 0.8372979164123535, 0.8422348499298096, 0.8728438019752502, 0.7895522713661194, 0.9062126874923706, 0.914057195186615, 0.8843432068824768, 0.9089615941047668, 0.8758654594421387, 0.8937554955482483, 0.9338052868843079, 0.9113107323646545, 0.939622163772583, 0.8505731225013733, 0.8243370652198792, 0.882219135761261, 0.8425231575965881, 0.9299699664115906, 0.8717467784881592, 0.888147234916687, 0.9736706614494324, 0.8889361023902893, 0.6999262571334839, 0.8567537665367126, 0.897861897945404, 0.8066918253898621, 0.8700346946716309, 0.9300782084465027, 0.9013988375663757, 0.9393139481544495, 0.9260469675064087, 0.883379340171814, 0.9121799468994141, 0.8848410248756409, 0.9193414449691772, 0.961920440196991, 0.7942165732383728, 0.8832256197929382, 0.8470898270606995, 0.9027779698371887, 0.9146113991737366, 0.9298304915428162, 0.8275153040885925, 0.8749185800552368, 0.9054835438728333, 0.8893036842346191, 0.8863405585289001, 0.8845537304878235, 0.8865556120872498, 0.8929800391197205, 0.9382264018058777, 0.86186283826828, 0.886163055896759, 0.8711994290351868, 0.9008506536483765, 0.9346122145652771, 0.7136858701705933, 0.9199740290641785, 0.8889860510826111, 0.8982237577438354, 0.8772132992744446, 0.8046537637710571, 0.9025169610977173, 0.8916126489639282, 0.9142829179763794, 0.8354976177215576, 0.8557063937187195, 0.8896272778511047, 0.6367477774620056, 0.8542671203613281, 0.804966390132904, 0.5706103444099426, 0.8901975154876709, 0.880965530872345, 0.7419624328613281, 0.8538910150527954, 0.886309802532196, 0.9330093860626221, 0.7799056172370911, 0.8972086310386658, 0.894142210483551, 0.902398407459259, 0.8507176041603088, 0.8828558921813965, 0.8821603059768677, 0.8473851084709167, 0.8677582144737244, 0.8616828322410583, 0.9447278380393982, 0.9361584782600403, 0.8439648151397705, 0.8530743718147278, 0.874862790107727, 0.8658404350280762, 0.870814323425293, 0.931939423084259, 0.9277738928794861, 0.8977034687995911, 0.9251944422721863, 0.9011794328689575, 0.9157556295394897, 0.9085866212844849, 0.9171887636184692, 0.9254169464111328, 0.8798081278800964, 0.6670505404472351, 0.9014903903007507, 0.8884797692298889, 0.5770328044891357, 0.8584403395652771, 0.8644798398017883, 0.7619462609291077, 0.9131075739860535, 0.514037013053894, 0.8326199650764465, 0.9039387106895447, 0.9055549502372742, 0.885313868522644, 0.8064324855804443, 0.8025254011154175, 0.7400510311126709, 0.8962417244911194, 0.8712220191955566, 0.9376463890075684, 0.880000114440918, 0.9354355335235596, 0.9430993795394897, 0.9316316246986389, 0.9039736390113831, 0.9102527499198914, 0.9458478689193726, 0.899481475353241, 0.9245336651802063, 0.8730503916740417, 0.882241427898407, 0.8990599513053894, 0.9109017252922058, 0.8700516819953918, 0.8785801529884338, 0.9292488694190979, 0.8881741166114807, 0.882388174533844, 0.9448016285896301, 0.88616544008255, 0.8912650942802429, 0.8627954721450806, 0.8954983949661255, 0.8677255511283875, 0.8984878659248352, 0.8402966856956482, 0.9150374531745911, 0.5639676451683044, 0.887032687664032, 0.863785445690155, 0.890785276889801, 0.9521369338035583, 0.8909574747085571, 0.8183220028877258, 0.7704432010650635, 0.7058089971542358, 0.895398736000061, 0.8854053020477295, 0.9013258814811707, 0.833986222743988, 0.616205632686615, 0.7646484971046448, 0.9327720403671265, 0.9120771288871765, 0.90819251537323, 0.9189731478691101, 0.9189616441726685, 0.9402300715446472, 0.920794665813446, 0.883995532989502, 0.9282860159873962, 0.7720585465431213, 0.8583394885063171, 0.8978723883628845, 0.8219570517539978, 0.9156839847564697, 0.9372292160987854, 0.9135204553604126, 0.769398033618927, 0.9239380955696106, 0.772773802280426, 0.9285620450973511, 0.900519609451294, 0.8724891543388367, 0.7822944521903992, 0.9056758284568787, 0.8737041354179382, 0.6906892657279968, 0.811456024646759, 0.8159605264663696, 0.945283830165863, 0.5079808831214905, 0.9373188614845276, 0.894439697265625, 0.8911042809486389, 0.9017531275749207, 0.8553838729858398, 0.9144664406776428, 0.9288524985313416, 0.8975022435188293, 0.7249704599380493, 0.9314519166946411, 0.8659527897834778, 0.872871458530426, 0.8094351887702942, 0.8877922892570496, 0.8795591592788696, 0.8449556231498718, 0.6533229351043701, 0.8263880014419556, 0.887859582901001, 0.7572716474533081, 0.8597446084022522, 0.930412769317627, 0.8589256405830383, 0.8345827460289001, 0.8479483127593994, 0.8286351561546326, 0.6451101899147034, 0.8066574931144714, 0.670255720615387, 0.9088881611824036, 0.8985598683357239, 0.9697017073631287, 0.9042297005653381, 0.9307424426078796, 0.7238070368766785, 0.9264894127845764, 0.9025589227676392, 0.9089139103889465, 0.899496853351593, 0.8888148069381714, 0.9077958464622498, 0.3518216907978058, 0.6369091272354126, 0.8816637992858887, 0.8659787178039551, 0.8791613578796387, 0.8825529217720032, 0.8745227456092834, 0.8618075847625732, 0.9145487546920776, 0.9262510538101196, 0.9000406265258789, 0.8802453279495239, 0.9523002505302429, 0.7287004590034485, 0.923520028591156, 0.9144026637077332, 0.8946927189826965, 0.8822077512741089, 0.8344621658325195, 0.8700429797172546, 0.8165808320045471, 0.8284302353858948, 0.726838231086731, 0.8720390796661377, 0.6968380212783813, 0.8478145003318787, 0.9137448668479919, 0.9103463292121887, 0.9195088148117065, 0.874937117099762, 0.868685781955719, 0.8884584307670593, 0.8897702097892761, 0.9532151222229004, 0.9032260179519653, 0.9196330308914185, 0.9172690510749817, 0.8809733986854553, 0.9406449198722839, 0.8393594622612, 0.8693493008613586, 0.898112952709198, 0.9347521066665649, 0.648004412651062, 0.9050248265266418, 0.8312179446220398, 0.8049445748329163, 0.7508442997932434, 0.7951844334602356, 0.7264017462730408, 0.7728692889213562, 0.6871468424797058, 0.6279421448707581, 0.8877918720245361, 0.9407138824462891, 0.9432530999183655, 0.9194082617759705, 0.813549816608429, 0.848717987537384, 0.8360697627067566, 0.9210802912712097, 0.8692174553871155, 0.8189886212348938, 0.8147476315498352, 0.8434051275253296, 0.8226283192634583, 0.8317306637763977, 0.8597916960716248, 0.9301463961601257, 0.9190394282341003, 0.925282895565033, 0.9194237589836121, 0.8765513896942139, 0.9549465775489807, 0.9233963489532471, 0.9031599164009094, 0.7877686619758606, 0.952080249786377, 0.6650164723396301, 0.8590720295906067, 0.9088208675384521, 0.9041362404823303, 0.9085103869438171, 0.720204770565033, 0.7428544163703918, 0.9446336627006531, 0.9252804517745972, 0.8556745052337646, 0.8660103678703308, 0.9107398390769958, 0.9261022210121155, 0.8372096419334412, 0.8667848110198975, 0.9240691065788269, 0.9272989630699158, 0.8789383769035339, 0.8392875790596008, 0.9276887774467468, 0.9057430624961853, 0.9132431149482727, 0.9351270794868469, 0.8145127296447754, 0.8845505118370056, 0.8291999697685242, 0.8904014229774475, 0.913844645023346, 0.9039368033409119, 0.9021787643432617, 0.8958982825279236, 0.9494115710258484, 0.8938574194908142, 0.7887588143348694, 0.7767663598060608, 0.5812065005302429, 0.8920212984085083, 0.7270811200141907, 0.8795889616012573, 0.9399830102920532, 0.900881826877594, 0.768742561340332, 0.9223254919052124, 0.9247103929519653, 0.9129250645637512, 0.9315280318260193, 0.8551207184791565, 0.8445253372192383, 0.8727909922599792, 0.9171600937843323, 0.923961341381073, 0.7260858416557312, 0.8985388875007629, 0.8649601340293884, 0.9331899285316467, 0.8716064095497131, 0.8810165524482727, 0.8341331481933594, 0.8043575286865234, 0.9199625253677368, 0.5816155672073364, 0.8819606900215149, 0.9377264380455017, 0.7148578763008118, 0.6940054893493652, 0.925285279750824, 0.8384788036346436, 0.8551244139671326, 0.9122293591499329, 0.7638779282569885, 0.7899782061576843, 0.8583368062973022, 0.8751968741416931, 0.5692107081413269, 0.8695321679115295, 0.7978915572166443, 0.8518596887588501, 0.9048132300376892, 0.8835107088088989, 0.8873204588890076, 0.9277709722518921, 0.8745021224021912, 0.919684112071991, 0.8851624131202698, 0.8842437863349915, 0.9182708859443665, 0.9236267805099487, 0.8868834376335144, 0.8859290480613708, 0.7834358811378479, 0.9287777543067932, 0.8928349614143372, 0.8603090643882751, 0.8864991664886475, 0.8911512494087219, 0.9141831994056702, 0.7271409034729004, 0.8724891543388367, 0.8969557285308838, 0.8779893517494202, 0.9452546238899231, 0.9226078391075134, 0.937252402305603, 0.9462077021598816, 0.9147685170173645, 0.8955391645431519, 0.5930871367454529, 0.9346396327018738, 0.796631932258606, 0.8364593982696533, 0.8496299386024475, 0.8272222876548767, 0.7403900027275085, 0.8360545635223389, 0.8463976383209229, 0.9067214131355286, 0.8987508416175842, 0.9582496881484985, 0.8745308518409729, 0.9525697827339172, 0.916962206363678, 0.8019208312034607, 0.8973203301429749, 0.886543333530426, 0.9070883393287659, 0.8367854952812195, 0.9337669014930725, 0.8285240530967712, 0.8901280760765076, 0.7917163968086243, 0.8884050250053406, 0.8789473176002502, 0.8790577054023743, 0.830254852771759, 0.8892822861671448, 0.8096040487289429, 0.8474510908126831, 0.9118515849113464, 0.7530533671379089, 0.8493841886520386, 0.884742796421051, 0.9185696244239807, 0.8863784670829773, 0.9100562930107117, 0.8820657134056091, 0.8607886433601379, 0.8744675517082214, 0.9321635365486145, 0.817514181137085, 0.9131281971931458, 0.8361014723777771, 0.9278342127799988, 0.8617569804191589, 0.9074344038963318, 0.9156255125999451, 0.9006339907646179, 0.9271959662437439, 0.857786238193512, 0.7745900750160217, 0.9463046193122864, 0.8250721096992493, 0.86777263879776, 0.925278902053833, 0.9067225456237793, 0.5370669364929199, 0.8731040358543396, 0.8596858382225037, 0.843914806842804, 0.8997529149055481, 0.8858717679977417, 0.8588573336601257, 0.7660423517227173, 0.9140482544898987, 0.8533329367637634, 0.7689310908317566, 0.7927245497703552, 0.8867692351341248, 0.9008249640464783, 0.8892461657524109, 0.8901995420455933, 0.9021191000938416, 0.9206562638282776, 0.90768963098526, 0.8608947396278381, 0.9213799834251404, 0.9333161115646362, 0.7802061438560486, 0.8969273567199707, 0.8670628666877747, 0.8651934266090393, 0.8403072357177734, 0.9696477055549622, 0.9058198928833008, 0.9127809405326843, 0.8309902548789978, 0.9307717680931091, 0.9100939631462097, 0.8874139189720154, 0.9270698428153992, 0.911714494228363, 0.8847891688346863, 0.9236703515052795, 0.9195041060447693, 0.879233181476593, 0.9049730896949768, 0.8347366452217102, 0.879599928855896, 0.9261762499809265, 0.6594739556312561, 0.8176146149635315, 0.8083746433258057, 0.9045808911323547, 0.7901210188865662, 0.8942374587059021, 0.9276431798934937, 0.8963066339492798, 0.9131014943122864, 0.9188909530639648, 0.9267246127128601, 0.9602264761924744, 0.9016312956809998, 0.9194741249084473, 0.9175740480422974, 0.8770992159843445, 0.8940581679344177, 0.8706566095352173, 0.9031074643135071, 0.898781418800354, 0.9131421446800232, 0.8587418794631958, 0.8842877149581909, 0.9163206815719604, 0.8894222974777222, 0.8226485252380371, 0.6156177520751953, 0.9509689807891846, 0.9501181840896606, 0.9057360291481018, 0.9298872351646423, 0.8591447472572327, 0.9132609963417053, 0.9295673370361328, 0.9159305095672607, 0.952789306640625, 0.9031062722206116, 0.9212917685508728, 0.8150290846824646, 0.8657405972480774, 0.9230424165725708, 0.8692554831504822, 0.8274734616279602, 0.913046658039093, 0.9254029989242554, 0.8585807681083679, 0.795942485332489, 0.8563938140869141, 0.8434186577796936, 0.9403135180473328, 0.7263244986534119, 0.8506236672401428, 0.7426185011863708, 0.8885793685913086, 0.846315324306488, 0.9243482351303101, 0.9222590327262878, 0.9413507580757141, 0.9592236876487732, 0.916021466255188, 0.7224404215812683, 0.7772327065467834, 0.829243004322052, 0.8941723704338074, 0.9160921573638916, 0.9166882634162903, 0.9171708822250366, 0.900750458240509, 0.9458762407302856, 0.9031928181648254, 0.9281107783317566, 0.9350063800811768, 0.9029825329780579, 0.893519937992096, 0.8954479098320007, 0.8938016295433044, 0.8937824368476868, 0.8876861929893494, 0.8809516429901123, 0.8871884942054749, 0.8913257718086243, 0.8013996481895447, 0.8977224230766296, 0.7458919882774353, 0.9347255825996399, 0.7255033850669861, 0.9107009768486023, 0.8200307488441467, 0.8176904320716858, 0.8922411203384399, 0.8878956437110901, 0.8846909999847412, 0.8895121812820435, 0.9199543595314026, 0.8282479643821716, 0.9211696982383728, 0.9289213418960571, 0.854656994342804, 0.7692617177963257, 0.8866941928863525, 0.7495533227920532, 0.9134017825126648, 0.8530042767524719, 0.9208608865737915, 0.938113272190094, 0.8419338464736938, 0.9260324835777283, 0.8980764150619507, 0.9300639033317566, 0.8434541821479797, 0.8696788549423218, 0.8822000622749329, 0.8826845288276672, 0.8992785811424255, 0.8715803027153015, 0.8899980187416077, 0.867773711681366, 0.8811267614364624, 0.8668305277824402, 0.9359963536262512, 0.8589871525764465, 0.8930556178092957, 0.7760857939720154, 0.8872513175010681, 0.8388314843177795, 0.7735031843185425, 0.8823541402816772, 0.8970031142234802, 0.8876248598098755, 0.8846445679664612, 0.8160162568092346, 0.8825824856758118, 0.9256808161735535, 0.8584482073783875, 0.9042379856109619, 0.8327970504760742, 0.8614546060562134, 0.9196068644523621, 0.9127262234687805, 0.9012348651885986, 0.8830216526985168, 0.8747556805610657, 0.9159134030342102, 0.9289347529411316, 0.9225785136222839, 0.9260578155517578, 0.8575761914253235, 0.9365366101264954, 0.7961133122444153, 0.9104340672492981, 0.8140355944633484, 0.7636269927024841, 0.8426393866539001, 0.8185768723487854, 0.9335061311721802, 0.9357238411903381, 0.7477551102638245, 0.8764979243278503, 0.8749295473098755, 0.8543140292167664, 0.9188244938850403, 0.9324713945388794, 0.9232010841369629, 0.9723958969116211, 0.9135681986808777, 0.9330806136131287, 0.7808010578155518, 0.8753562569618225, 0.9213442206382751, 0.912550687789917, 0.8815920948982239, 0.8730239868164062, 0.8180896639823914, 0.8999307751655579, 0.8799461722373962, 0.8114499449729919, 0.9413359761238098, 0.8757770657539368, 0.8939992785453796, 0.6403219103813171, 0.8996555209159851, 0.925274670124054, 0.9059363007545471, 0.899407684803009, 0.8973703980445862, 0.8868401050567627, 0.8888856768608093, 0.9027786254882812, 0.8482816219329834, 0.8314526081085205, 0.9824085831642151, 0.7986658215522766, 0.8916184306144714, 0.8262689709663391, 0.8868208527565002, 0.8199177384376526, 0.9130532145500183, 0.9426462054252625, 0.8637222647666931, 0.9064030051231384, 0.9095149636268616, 0.9322509169578552, 0.8507077097892761, 0.9099186658859253, 0.945949137210846, 0.8690025210380554, 0.9240038394927979, 0.9349011778831482, 0.8978516459465027, 0.8706591725349426, 0.8560131192207336, 0.8168749213218689, 0.8610983490943909, 0.8636273741722107, 0.9468526244163513, 0.8457494974136353, 0.9026678204536438, 0.9057161211967468, 0.9335087537765503, 0.9093868136405945, 0.8181194067001343, 0.8974373936653137, 0.9157713651657104, 0.8954855799674988, 0.8323572278022766, 0.8777029514312744, 0.9107208251953125, 0.8214091062545776, 0.7958104014396667, 0.8587983250617981, 0.9116543531417847, 0.861609160900116, 0.9084489941596985, 0.8840607404708862, 0.9019320011138916, 0.8675454258918762, 0.8110862374305725, 0.8687812685966492, 0.752564549446106, 0.9215256571769714, 0.811162531375885, 0.8710898756980896, 0.5684723258018494, 0.9024848341941833, 0.8977362513542175, 0.927335798740387, 0.899246871471405, 0.8575995564460754, 0.8322523236274719, 0.8695264458656311, 0.8684625029563904, 0.8991778492927551, 0.9313066601753235, 0.9251201748847961, 0.8870648145675659, 0.8993818163871765, 0.8589851260185242, 0.8806363344192505, 0.8725681900978088, 0.8507227301597595, 0.8583186268806458, 0.8606410026550293, 0.8809958100318909, 0.8736133575439453, 0.9326544404029846, 0.8848361372947693, 0.9274922609329224, 0.9025319218635559, 0.871049165725708, 0.8885281682014465, 0.9106310606002808, 0.8366072177886963, 0.9515836238861084, 0.8215581774711609, 0.9211965799331665, 0.90827876329422, 0.9272163510322571, 0.8726259469985962, 0.7486565709114075, 0.8389844298362732, 0.9423597455024719, 0.8800244331359863, 0.8162590861320496, 0.897357165813446, 0.8820012211799622, 0.9139227271080017, 0.623891294002533, 0.8569355607032776, 0.8667195439338684, 0.9150891304016113, 0.9226793646812439, 0.9420438408851624, 0.9297893643379211, 0.9537906050682068, 0.8412595391273499, 0.9303315877914429, 0.9071870446205139, 0.8877443075180054, 0.8891969919204712, 0.8809288740158081, 0.895080029964447, 0.8670918941497803, 0.8633309006690979, 0.9044889211654663, 0.895791232585907, 0.8810474276542664, 0.9295054078102112, 0.823369562625885, 0.8798853158950806, 0.8251822590827942, 0.8927081227302551, 0.8351505398750305, 0.8610156774520874, 0.9165286421775818, 0.9294162392616272, 0.7149890065193176, 0.9132766723632812, 0.8658624887466431, 0.873491644859314, 0.8659400939941406, 0.9289937615394592, 0.7277452349662781, 0.928658664226532, 0.8012455105781555, 0.9037511944770813, 0.878976047039032, 0.7217420935630798, 0.7988829016685486, 0.8755186200141907, 0.8533175587654114, 0.8745383620262146, 0.9434090256690979, 0.9161547422409058, 0.8896887898445129, 0.9401715397834778, 0.9646397829055786, 0.9100473523139954, 0.905941903591156, 0.8496665358543396, 0.9120085835456848, 0.8914332985877991, 0.895641565322876, 0.8728869557380676, 0.922662615776062, 0.8304605484008789, 0.7150221467018127, 0.8797246813774109, 0.8154009580612183, 0.9228132367134094, 0.8997089266777039, 0.9121184349060059, 0.9312180876731873, 0.9067618250846863, 0.9646371006965637, 0.7736343741416931, 0.8830327391624451, 0.915370762348175, 0.8938688635826111, 0.9442330002784729, 0.8385566473007202, 0.8933748602867126, 0.806330144405365, 0.83268803358078, 0.7904407382011414, 0.8909172415733337, 0.9044068455696106, 0.8103919625282288, 0.9345077872276306, 0.8873991370201111, 0.9284588694572449, 0.9024909734725952, 0.8230621814727783, 0.9769728779792786, 0.8735622763633728, 0.8646833300590515, 0.8756478428840637, 0.9392787218093872, 0.8770191669464111, 0.9251212477684021, 0.898293137550354, 0.9452019333839417, 0.8624714016914368, 0.8910430073738098, 0.7804687023162842, 0.9067165851593018, 0.8436141014099121, 0.9169135093688965, 0.9292828440666199, 0.9137334227561951, 0.9015870690345764, 0.9463452100753784, 0.9250330328941345, 0.9159297347068787, 0.879906415939331, 0.9207853674888611, 0.8546910881996155, 0.816299319267273, 0.7934588193893433, 0.9258370995521545, 0.9151532053947449, 0.7256408333778381, 0.9272753596305847, 0.9452196955680847, 0.8770708441734314, 0.9016566872596741, 0.9068814516067505]}